Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 56 Uniform Supplemental Commercial Law for the Uniform Regulation of Virtual-Currency Businesses Act

6-56-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Supplemental Commercial Law for the Uniform Regulation of Virtual-Currency Businesses Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 226, § 5; P.L. 2019, ch. 246, § 5.

6-56-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Article 8” means Article 8 of the Uniform Commercial Code, as amended, in substantially the form approved by the American Law Institute and the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws.

“Control” has the meaning provided in §

19-14.3-1.1(1)

.

“Hague Securities Convention” means the Convention on the Law Applicable to Certain Rights in Respect of Securities Held with an Intermediary, concluded 5 July, 2006.

“Uniform Commercial Code jurisdiction” means a state that has enacted Article 8.

“Uniform Regulation of Virtual-Currency Businesses Act” means chapter 14.3 of title 19 of the Rhode Island general laws.

“User” means a person for which a licensee has control of virtual currency.

Other definitions applying to this chapter and the sections of the Uniform Regulation of Virtual-Currency Businesses Act in which they appear are as follows:

“Licensee” as set forth in §

19-14.3-1.1

.

“Record” as set forth in §

19-14.3-1.1

.

“Resident” as set forth in § 19-14.3-1.1.

“Sign” as set forth in § 19-14.3-1.1.

“State” as set forth in § 19-14.3-1.1.

“Virtual currency” as set forth in §

19-14-1

.

Other definitions applying to this chapter and the sections of Article 8 in which they appear are as follows:

“Entitlement holder” as set forth in § 8-102(a).

“Financial asset” as set forth in § 8-102(a).

“Securities intermediary” as set forth in § 8-102(a).

“Security” as set forth in § 8-102(a).

“Securities account” as set forth in § 8-501.

The definition of “agreement” applying to this chapter appears in § 1-201(b)(3) of Article 1 of the Uniform Commercial Code, as amended, in substantially the form approved by the American Law Institute and the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 226, § 5; P.L. 2019, ch. 246, § 5.

6-56-3.
Scope.

This chapter applies to:

A person or transaction governed by the Uniform Regulation of Virtual-Currency Businesses Act; and

A user that is not a resident if the user or transaction with the user would be governed by the Uniform Regulation of Virtual-Currency Businesses Act if the user were a resident.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 226, § 5; P.L. 2019, ch. 246, § 5.

6-56-4.
Incorporation of Article 8.

The relationship between a licensee or registrant and a user shall be evidenced by an agreement in a record signed by the licensee or registrant and by the user. The agreement:

Shall specify the jurisdiction whose law governs the agreement;

If governed by the law of a jurisdiction that is not a Uniform Commercial Code jurisdiction, the agreement shall:

Specify a Uniform Commercial Code jurisdiction as the securities intermediary’s jurisdiction for the purpose of Article 8; and

State that the law in force in the Uniform Commercial Code jurisdiction under subsection (2)(i) of this section applies to all issues specified in Article 2(1) of the Hague Securities Convention;

Shall state that:

The licensee is a securities intermediary;

The control of virtual currency by the licensee for the benefit of the user creates a securities account of which the user is the entitlement holder;

The parties agree that the virtual currency is to be treated as a financial asset credited or held for credit to the securities account of the user; and

The licensee will not grant a security interest in virtual currency which the licensee or registrant is obligated to maintain under § 8-504(a) of Article 8;

May not provide a standard for the licensee to comply with its duties under Part 5 of Article 8 of the Uniform Commercial Code which is less protective of the user than the standard that would apply under Part 5 of Article 8 of the Uniform Commercial Code in the absence of an agreement concerning the standard; and

May not provide that:

The securities intermediary’s jurisdiction for the purpose of Article 8 is a jurisdiction that is not a Uniform Commercial Code jurisdiction; or

The law in force in a jurisdiction that is not a Uniform Commercial Code jurisdiction applies to all issues specified in Article 2(1) of The Hague Securities Convention.

To the extent that there is no agreement that complies with subsection (a) of this section, the relationship between a licensee or registrant and a user is determined as if the licensee or registrant and the user have an agreement that complies with subsection (a) of this section and specifies that the law of this state governs the agreement.

The effect of this section may not be varied by agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 226, § 5; P.L. 2019, ch. 246, § 5.

6-56-5.
Qualifying office under Hague Securities Convention.

A licensee shall maintain in a state an office that complies with the second sentence of Article 4(1) of The Hague Securities Convention.

The effect of this section may not be varied by agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 226, § 5; P.L. 2019, ch. 246, § 5.

6-56-6.
Effect of failure to comply with this chapter.

Failure to comply with this chapter is a violation of the Uniform Regulation of Virtual-Currency Businesses Act.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 226, § 5; P.L. 2019, ch. 246, § 5.

6-56-7.
No inference as to characterization under other statute or rule.

Treatment of virtual currency as a financial asset credited to a securities account under this chapter and Article 8 of the Uniform Commercial Code does not determine the characterization or treatment of the virtual currency under any other statute or rule.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 226, § 5; P.L. 2019, ch. 246, § 5.

6-56-8.
Supplementary law.

Unless displaced by the particular provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity supplement this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 226, § 5; P.L. 2019, ch. 246, § 5.

6-56-9.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 226, § 5; P.L. 2019, ch. 246, § 5.

6-56-10.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, or supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. § 7003(b).

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 226, § 5; P.L. 2019, ch. 246, § 5.

6-56-11.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or application of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 226, § 5; P.L. 2019, ch. 246, § 5.